Nebraska, session 109, LB417.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, Nebraska Promise
Program means a program at the University of Nebraska that covers
undergraduate tuition costs for eligible students of up to fifteen credit
hours per semester and thirty credit hours per academic year, after
Federal Pell Grant funds and other grants and scholarships are
subtracted, at any of the University of Nebraska's campuses or at the
Nebraska College of Technical Agriculture.
(2) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall
administer the Nebraska Promise Program.
(3)(a) To be eligible for the Nebraska Promise Program, a student
shall:
(i) Be a Nebraska resident;
(ii) Have a family income of less than sixty-five thousand dollars
per year as determined pursuant to the Free Application for Federal
Student Aid or be eligible for a Federal Pell Grant; and
(iii) Be registered as a full-time undergraduate student at the
University of Nebraska or at the Nebraska College of Technical
Agriculture taking at least twelve credit hours per academic semester or
the equivalent.
(b) To remain eligible for the Nebraska Promise Program, a student
shall comply with all requirements of the University of Nebraska for
program eligibility and shall maintain a grade point average of at least
two and one-half on a four-point scale or its equivalent.
Sec. 2. Sections 2 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the College Promise Act.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the College Promise Act:
(1) Community college has the same meaning as in section 85-1503;
and
(2) State college means a public postsecondary educational
institution which is part of the Nebraska state college system.
Sec. 4. (1) A student shall be entitled to a waiver of one hundred
-2-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
percent of the resident tuition charges of any community college or state
college in Nebraska if the student:
(a) Is a Nebraska resident; and
(b) Has a family income of less than sixty-five thousand dollars per
year as determined pursuant to the Free Application for Federal Student
Aid.
(2) To remain eligible for a tuition waiver, a student shall comply
with all requirements of the community college or state college for
continued attendance and award of an associate degree or baccalaureate
degree and maintain a grade point average of at least two and one-half on
a four-point scale or its equivalent. A student may receive the tuition
waiver for up to two years at a community college or four years at a
state college. The two-year or four-year eligibility starts once the
student applies for and receives the tuition waiver for the first time.
Sec. 5. (1) A student shall include verification of the eligibility
requirements on forms and in a manner prescribed by the community college
or state college when applying to such community college or state college
in order to receive the tuition waiver. Within forty-five days after
receipt of a completed application, the community college or state
college shall send written notice of the student's eligibility or
ineligibility for the tuition waiver. If the student is determined to not
be eligible for the tuition wavier, the notice shall include the reason
for such determination and an indication that an appeal of the
determination may be made pursuant to the appeals process developed by
the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to
section 6 of this act.
(2) If the student is eligible for the waiver, a community college
or a state college shall waive one hundred percent of the student's
tuition remaining due after subtracting awarded federal financial aid
grants and state scholarships.
Sec. 6. (1) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
-3-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
shall develop an appeals procedure for tuition waiver determinations made
pursuant to the College Promise Act.
(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the College Promise Act.
Sec. 7. (1)(a) On or before June 1 of each year, the Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education shall certify the total amount of
tuition waived by each of the community colleges and state colleges
during the preceding school year pursuant to the College Promise Act and
submit such certification to the State Treasurer.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer an amount equal to the
certified amount submitted by the Coordinating Commission for
Postsecondary Education pursuant to this section from the General Fund to
the College Promise Fund in ten equal monthly payments beginning in
September of the year in which such certification was made and continuing
through June.
(2)(a) The Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education
shall, from the amount appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose,
make distributions to each community college and state college in an
amount equal to the total value of all waivers provided by the community
college or state college pursuant to the College Promise Act. The
distributions shall be made in ten equal payments distributed monthly
beginning in September and continuing through June. The community
colleges shall receive no payments during the months of July and August.
(b) If the amount appropriated does not equal the total value of all
waivers provided by the community college or state college pursuant to
the College Promise Act, a community college or state college shall not
provide additional waivers pursuant to the act in any future school year
until the community college or state college has been fully reimbursed
for the value of the tuition waivers previously provided pursuant to the
College Promise Act.
(3) The College Promise Fund is created. The Coordinating Commission
-4-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
for Postsecondary Education shall administer the fund to provide
distributions to community colleges and state colleges pursuant to this
section. The fund shall consist of transfers pursuant to this section and
as authorized by the Legislature. It is the intent of the Legislature to
fully fund the College Promise Fund each year in an amount equal to the
total value of tuition waivers provided by the community colleges and
state colleges pursuant to the College Promise Act. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 8. Section 79-760.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-760.03 (1) For school year 2009-10 and each school year
thereafter, the State Board of Education shall implement a statewide
system for the assessment of student learning and for reporting the
performance of school districts and learning communities pursuant to this
section. The assessment and reporting system shall measure student
knowledge of subject matter materials covered by measurable academic
content standards selected by the state board.
(2) The state board shall adopt a plan for an assessment and
reporting system and implement and maintain the assessment and reporting
system according to such plan. The plan shall be submitted annually to
the State Department of Education, the Governor, the chairperson of the
Education Committee of the Legislature, and the Clerk of the Legislature.
The plan submitted to the committee and the Clerk of the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. The state board shall select grade
levels for assessment and reporting required pursuant to subsections (4)
through (7) of this section. The purposes of the system are to:
(a) Determine how well public schools are performing in terms of
achievement of public school students related to the state academic
content standards;
-5-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
(b) Report the performance of public schools based upon the results
of state assessment instruments and national assessment instruments;
(c) Provide information for the public and policymakers on the
performance of public schools; and
(d) Provide for the comparison among Nebraska public schools and the
comparison of Nebraska public schools to public schools elsewhere.
(3) The Governor shall appoint a technical advisory committee to
review (a) the statewide assessment plan, (b) state assessment
instruments, and (c) the accountability system developed under the
Quality Education Accountability Act. The technical advisory committee
shall consist of three nationally recognized experts in educational
assessment and measurement, one administrator from a school in Nebraska,
and one teacher from a school in Nebraska. The members shall serve terms
of three years, except that two of the members shall be appointed for
initial terms of two years. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor
for the remainder of the term. One of the members shall be designated as
chairperson by the Governor. Members shall be reimbursed for expenses as
provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. The committee shall advise the
Governor, the state board, and the State Department of Education on the
development of statewide assessment instruments and the statewide
assessment plan. The appointments to the committee shall be confirmed by
the Legislature.
(4) Through school year 2016-17, the state board shall prescribe a
statewide assessment of writing that relies on writing samples in each of
three grades selected by the state board. Each year at least one of the
three selected grades shall participate in the statewide writing
assessment with each selected grade level participating at least once
every three years.
(5) For school year 2009-10 and for each school year thereafter, the
state board shall prescribe a statewide assessment of reading. The
statewide assessment of reading shall include assessment instruments for
-6-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
each of the grade levels three through eight and for one grade in high
school and standards adopted by the state board pursuant to section
79-760.01. For school year 2017-18 and each school year thereafter, the
statewide assessment of reading shall include a component of writing as
determined by the state board.
(6) For no later than school year 2010-11 and for each school year
thereafter, the state board shall prescribe a statewide assessment of
mathematics. The statewide assessment of mathematics shall include
assessment instruments for each of the grade levels three through eight
and for one grade in high school and standards adopted by the state board
pursuant to section 79-760.01.
(7) For no later than school year 2011-12 and each school year
thereafter, the state board shall prescribe a statewide assessment of
science. The statewide assessment of science shall include assessment
instruments for each of the grade levels selected by the state board and
standards adopted by the state board pursuant to section 79-760.01. The
grade levels shall include at least one grade in elementary school, one
grade in middle school or junior high school, and one grade in high
school.
(8) The department shall conduct studies to verify the technical
quality of assessment instruments and demonstrate the comparability of
assessment instrument results required by the Quality Education
Accountability Act act. The department shall annually report such
findings to the Governor, the Legislature, and the state board. The
report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(9) The state board shall recommend national assessment instruments
for the purpose of national comparison. Beginning with school year
2017-18, the state board shall select a national assessment instrument
that is also used as a standard college admission test which shall be
administered to students in the eleventh grade in every public high
school in each school district. Each school district shall report
-7-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
individual student data for scores and sub-scores according to procedures
established by the state board and the department pursuant to section
79-760.05.
(10)(a) Beginning with school year 2025-26, in addition to the
national assessment instrument recommended pursuant to subsection (9) of
this section, the state board shall recommend nationally recognized,
portable career-readiness assessments that lead to a National Career
Readiness Certificate.
(b) The option to retake the national assessment instrument that is
also used as a standard college admission test administered pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section or to take any nationally recognized,
portable career-readiness assessments that lead to a National Career
Readiness Certificate recommended by the state board pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be available to all twelfth-
grade public students during the fall semester of a student's twelfth
grade year. Each school district shall report individual student data for
scores and sub-scores for any assessment taken pursuant to this
subsection according to the procedures established by the state board and
the department for assessments pursuant to section 79-760.05.
(c) An assessment described in this subsection shall be administered
to any student that opts to take such assessment at no cost to such
student.
(11) (10) The aggregate results of assessment instruments and
national assessment instruments shall be reported by the district on a
building basis to the public in that district, to the learning community
coordinating council if such district is a member of a learning
community, and to the department. Each learning community shall also
report the aggregate results of any assessment instruments and national
assessment instruments to the public in that learning community and to
the department. The department shall report the aggregate results of any
assessment instruments and national assessment instruments on a learning
-8-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
community, district, and building basis as part of the statewide
assessment and reporting system.
(12)(a) (11)(a) The assessment and reporting plan shall:
(i) Provide for the confidentiality of the results of individual
students; and
(ii) Include all public schools and all public school students.
(b) The state board shall adopt criteria for the inclusion of
students with disabilities, students entering the school for the first
time, and students with limited English proficiency.
The department may determine appropriate accommodations for the
assessment of students with disabilities or any student receiving special
education programs and services pursuant to section 79-1139. Alternate
academic achievement standards in reading, mathematics, and science and
alternate assessment instruments aligned with the standards may be among
the accommodations for students with severe cognitive disabilities.
(13) (12) The state board may select additional grade levels,
subject areas, or assessment instruments for statewide assessment
consistent with federal requirements.
(14) (13) The state board shall not require school districts to
administer assessments or assessment instruments which are not consistent
with the Quality Education Accountability Act act.
(15) (14) The state board may appoint committees of teachers, from
each appropriate subject area, and administrators to assist in the
development of statewide assessment instruments required by the act.
Sec. 9. Section 79-760.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-760.05 (1) The State Board of Education shall implement a
statewide system for tracking individual student achievement, using the
student identifier system of the State Department of Education, that can
be aggregated to track student progress by demographic characteristics,
including, but not limited to, race, poverty, high mobility, attendance,
-9-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
and limited English proficiency, on available measures of student
achievement which include, but need not be limited to, national
assessment instruments, state assessment instruments, and the indicators
used in the accountability system required pursuant to section 79-760.06.
Such a system shall be designed so as to aggregate student data by
available educational input characteristics, which may include class
size, teacher education, teacher experience, special education, early
childhood programs, federal programs, and other targeted education
programs. School districts shall provide the department with individual
student achievement data from assessment instruments required or
voluntarily taken pursuant to section 79-760.03 in order to implement the
statewide system.
(2)(a) On or before August 1, 2022, the state board shall also
implement a statewide system for tracking individual student discipline,
using the student identifier system of the department, that can be
aggregated to track student discipline by type of discipline and
demographic characteristics, including, but not limited to, race,
poverty, high mobility, attendance, disability, and limited English
proficiency. The state board shall cause each school district to report,
by individual student, any:
(i) Act resulting in an in-school suspension, a short-term
suspension, a long-term suspension, a one-semester expulsion, a two-
semester expulsion, an assignment to an alternative school or
alternative-learning program, the use of physical intervention with such
student, or the restraint or seclusion of such student;
(ii) Offense constituting grounds for a long-term suspension, an
expulsion, or a mandatory reassignment pursuant to section 79-267,
regardless of consequences assigned; and
(iii) Act resulting in law enforcement involvement, including any
incident reported to law enforcement or to an onsite school resource
officer, and any school-related citation or arrest.
-10-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
(b) For purposes of this subsection, school-related citation or
arrest shall include a citation or arrest of a student for any activity
conducted on school grounds; in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by
a school being used for a school purpose or in a vehicle being driven for
a school purpose by a school employee or by such employee's designee; or
at a school-sponsored activity or athletic event.
(c) The system for tracking individual student discipline may also
be used to record other disciplinary incidents.
(d) Each school shall designate at least one discipline data
coordinator for the purposes of gathering and reporting the discipline
data required pursuant to this subsection.
(3) The department shall annually analyze and report on student
achievement and on student discipline for the state, each school
district, each public school, and each learning community aggregated by
the demographic characteristics described in subsection (1) of this
section. The department shall report the findings to the Governor, the
Legislature, school districts, educational service units, and each
learning community. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically. Such analysis shall include aggregated data
that would indicate differences in achievement and differences in student
discipline due to available educational input characteristics described
in subsection (1) of this section. Such analysis shall include indicators
of progress toward state achievement goals for students in poverty,
limited English proficient students, students with disabilities, and
highly mobile students.
Sec. 10. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of this act become
operative three calendar months after the adjournment of this legislative
session. The other sections of this act become operative on their
effective date.
Sec. 11. Original sections 79-760.03 and 79-760.05, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-11-

LB417 LB417
2025 2025
Sec. 12. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-12-